District of Columbia statutes.
8-108.05

Rules.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter.

Mar. 31, 2011, D.C. Law 18-336, § 6, 58 DCR 605
Public utilities, environmental impact statement requirements, see § 34-2601.
Environmental Quality Improvement Act of 1970, see 42 U.S.C. § 4321 et seq.
National Environmental Policy Act of 1969, see 42 U.S.C. § 4321 et seq.
This section is referenced in § 8-108.04.